California, session 20252026, AB2749.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 653.25 of the Penal Code is amended to read:653.25. (a) It is unlawful for any person to loiter in any public place with the intent to purchase commercial sex. This intent is evidenced by acting in a manner and under circumstances that openly demonstrate the purpose of inducing, enticing, or soliciting prostitution, or procuring another to commit prostitution such as circling an area in a motor vehicle and repeatedly beckoning to, contacting, or attempting to contact or stop pedestrians or other motorists, making unauthorized stops along known prostitution tracks, or engaging in other conduct indicative of soliciting to procure another to engage in commercial sex. A person is guilty of this offense only if the person takes a direct but ineffectual act done towards its commission that indicates a definite and unambiguous intent to purchase commercial sex. The act must go beyond planning or preparation. It does not require a completed communication.(b) A violation of this section shall, in addition to any other punishment, be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000). Fines collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Survivor Support Fund.